Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.290

Agency party to controversy.

Records that are relevant to a controversy to which an agency is a party but which records would not be available to another party under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes pending in the superior courts are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2005 c 274 s 409.]